District of Columbia statutes.
48-905.07

Mayoral subpoenas.

(a)

In any investigation relating to the Mayor’s functions under this subchapter with respect to controlled substances, the Mayor may subpoena witnesses, compel the attendance and testimony of witnesses, and require the production of any records (including books, papers, documents, and other tangible things which constitute or contain evidence) which the Mayor finds relevant or material to the investigation. The attendance of witnesses and the production of records may be required from any place in the District of Columbia. Witnesses summoned under this section shall be paid the same fees and mileage that are paid witnesses in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

(b)

A subpoena issued under this section may be served by any person designated in the subpoena to serve it. Service upon a natural person may be made by personal delivery of the subpoena to that person. Service may be made upon a domestic or foreign corporation or upon a partnership or other unincorporated association which is subject to suit under a common name, by delivering the subpoena to an officer, to a managing or general agent, or to any other agent authorized by appointment or by law to receive service of process. The affidavit of the person serving the subpoena entered on a true copy thereof by the person serving it shall be proof of service.

(c)

In the case of contumacy by or refusal to obey a subpoena issued to any person, the Mayor may invoke the aid of any District of Columbia court within the jurisdiction of which the investigation is carried on or of which the subpoenaed person is an inhabitant, or in which the subpoenaed person carries on business or may be found, to compel compliance with the subpoena. The court may issue an order requiring the subpoenaed person to appear before the Mayor to produce records, if so ordered, or to give testimony touching the matter under investigation. Any failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by the court as a contempt thereof.

Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-29, § 507, 28 DCR 3081
May 10, 1989, D.C. Law 7-231, § 41, 36 DCR 492
This section is referenced in § 48-905.05.
1981 Ed., § 33-557.